South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S22.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 61-4-770 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 61-4-770.  Wines containing more than sixteen and one-half twenty percent of alcohol by volume may be sold only in licensed alcoholic liquor stores or in establishments licensed to sell and permit consumption of alcoholic liquors by the drink. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----